Utah statutes.
4-31-112.   Feeding garbage or plate waste to swine prohibited.

(1)  As used in this section, "plate waste" means uneaten food from an establishment or institution that serves food.

(2)  A person may not feed garbage or plate waste to a swine, unless the swine is slaughtered for home use.

(3)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

